Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-3003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Nebraska Mental Health First Aid Training Act:

(1) Behavioral health
regions means the behavioral health regions established pursuant to section
71-807; and

(2) Mental health first
aid means the help provided to a person who is experiencing a mental health
or substance abuse problem or in a mental health crisis before appropriate
professional assistance or other supports are secured.

Laws 2014, LB901, § 4.